New Mexico, session 2026, SB259.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. A new section of Chapter 30 NMSA 1978 is enacted to read: "[NEW MATERIAL] THREATENING A LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER OR AN IMMEDIATE FAMILY MEMBER OF A LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER--PENALTY.-- A. Threatening a law enforcement officer or an immediate family member of a law enforcement officer consists of a person making a threat, with the intent to: (1) place the law enforcement officer or the immediate family member of a law enforcement officer in fear of great bodily harm to the law enforcement officer or to an immediate family member of the law enforcement officer; (2) prevent or interrupt the law enforcement officer's ability to carry out the law enforcement officer's job duties; or (3) retaliate against a law enforcement officer on account of the performance of the law enforcement officer's official duties during the law enforcement officer's term of service. B. A person who commits threatening a law enforcement officer or an immediate family member of a law enforcement officer is guilty of a fourth degree felony. C. As used in this section: (1) "immediate family member" means a spouse, child, sibling, parent, grandparent or grandchild, and "immediate family member" includes a stepparent, a stepchild, a stepsibling and an adoptive relationship; and (2) "law enforcement officer" means a local, state, federal or tribal law enforcement officer." SECTION 2. A new section of Chapter 30 NMSA 1978 is enacted to read: "[NEW MATERIAL] MALICIOUS SHARING OF PERSONAL INFORMATION OF A LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER OR AN IMMEDIATE FAMILY MEMBER OF A LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER--PENALTY.-- A. Malicious sharing of personal information of a law enforcement officer or an immediate family member of a law enforcement officer consists of a person sharing personal information, with the intent to: (1) cause harm to the law enforcement officer or the immediate family member of a law enforcement officer; (2) place the law enforcement officer or the immediate family member of a law enforcement officer in fear of great bodily harm to the law enforcement officer or to an immediate family member of the law enforcement officer; or (3) prevent or interrupt the law enforcement officer's ability to carry out the law enforcement officer's job duties. B. A person who commits malicious sharing of personal information of a law enforcement officer or an immediate family member of a law enforcement officer is guilty of a misdemeanor. C. As used in this section: (1) "immediate family member" means a spouse, child, sibling, parent, grandparent or grandchild, and "immediate family member" includes a stepparent, a stepchild, a stepsibling and an adoptive relationship; (2) "law enforcement officer" means a local, state, federal or tribal law enforcement officer; and (3) "personal information" means a person's physical address, phone number, email or physical location." - 4 -